Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3208.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 20 of chapter 30A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after the word “notice”, in line 7, the following:- “shall be
publicized on the public body’s website, and”
of 1